Hawaii, session 2026, SB2704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established within the department of agriculture and biosecurity a three-year subsistence-plus gardening pilot program. (b) The program shall: (1)  Identify underutilized small plots of land, not more than two acres, suitable for gardening based on soil, terrain, and water availability; (2)  Invite small community-based farm clubs, which have demonstrated participation and momentum in their respective communities, to participate in the program for the purposes of planting, growing, and harvesting priority crops, including Hawaiian canoe crops to improve food security and food sovereignty in the State; (3)  Make the identified lands available to participating small community-based farm clubs; and (4)  Provide support for community food production hubs. SECTION 2. The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, concerning the subsistence-plus gardening pilot program to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2029. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for a subsistence-plus gardening pilot program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________